Utah statutes.
20A-3-505.   False impersonation -- Double voting.

(1) (a)  A person may not apply for a ballot:

(i)  in the name of some other person, whether it is that of a person living or dead, or of a fictitious person; or

(ii)  after having voted once at an election, apply again at the same election for a ballot in the person's own name or any other name.

(b)  Any person who violates Subsection (1)(a) is guilty of a third degree felony.

(2) (a)  A person may not aid, assist, counsel, or procure another person to commit the felony prohibited in Subsection (1)(a).

(b)  Any person who violates Subsection (2)(a) is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.



Amended by Chapter 276, 2008 General Session

